Hawaii statutes.
C. Benefits

[§88-70] Third application for retirement;
withdrawal prohibited and retirement mandatory. If a member:

(1) Has submitted two separate written applications
for service retirement but has withdrawn each of the applications prior to the
dates of retirement specified in the applications; and

(2) Submits a third written application for service
retirement;

during the member's lifetime, the member shall not
be allowed to withdraw the third application and shall be retired on the date
specified in the third application. [L 1982, c 115, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next